North Dakota statutes. TITLE 40 Municipal Government
CHAPTER 40-52 Changes in Wards

40-52-01.
Petition for change in name, number, or boundaries of wards — Signatures required — Notice of meeting to hear. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

40-52-02.
Governing body may order change in wards. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1957, ch. 292, § 2.

40-52-03.
Governing body of council city may change boundaries of wards — Wards not to be diminished or increased. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1957, ch. 292, § 2.

40-52-04.
Changing number and boundaries of wards and precincts.

The number and boundaries of the wards and precincts in a city may be changed by an ordinance adopted by a majority vote of the members of the governing body. Such ordinance shall be introduced at a regular meeting of the board, and before final action is taken on the proposed ordinance, it shall be published in the official newspaper of the city once each week for four successive weeks. When the boundaries of wards are fixed by ordinance, the number of such wards and the boundaries thereof shall not be changed for a period of two years, except by adding thereto territory which is added to the city limits. The territory in a ward shall be contiguous and compact, and no ward having a population of less than one hundred residents shall be created. The terms “wards”and “precincts” shall have the meaning provided for in section 40-21-09.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 45, § 12; 1911, ch. 77, § 12; C.L. 1913, § 3782; R.C. 1943, § 40-5204; S.L. 1957, ch. 292, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 40-5204; S.L. 1967, ch. 158, § 102.

Cross-References.

Change of name of municipality, see ch. 32-28.

40-52-05.
Changes to be made in papers, plats, and records of municipality.

Whenever a change in the number or boundaries of wards is made, the governing body of the municipality shall direct the municipal attorney to cause to be made all needful changes in papers, plats, and matters of record.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 110, § 3; R.C. 1895, § 2451; R.C. 1899, § 2451; R.C. 1905, § 2959; C.L. 1913, § 3982; R.C. 1943, § 40-5205.

40-52-06.
City auditor to make changes in assessment list.

The city auditor shall make any changes in assessment lists necessitated by any change in the names, numbers, or boundaries of the wards in the municipality.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 110, § 4; R.C. 1895, § 2452; R.C. 1899, § 2452; R.C. 1905, § 2960; C.L. 1913, § 3983; R.C. 1943, § 40-5206.

40-52-07.
Holding elections in new ward or wards.

Ten days before the regular municipal election following any change in the wards in the municipality, the governing body shall designate the proper polling place or places for the new ward or wards, appoint judges and clerks therefor, make all necessary provisions for holding the election, and designate the several officers to be chosen therefrom.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 110, § 5; R.C. 1895, § 2453; R.C. 1899, § 2453; R.C. 1905, § 2961; C.L. 1913, § 3984; R.C. 1943, § 40-5207.

40-52-08.
Council member changing wards can continue in office.

A council member who was duly elected, but because of the change in boundaries of the ward no longer resides within the ward from which the member was elected, but is still residing within the city limits, can continue in office for the term for which the member was elected and until a successor is duly elected and qualified for the ward.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 283, § 1; 1991, ch. 440, § 20.